Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB193.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 14 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "qualified jailer" means an individual who:
(a) Is currently serving or previously served as a duly elected or appointed jailer
in the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
(b) Has not been:
1. Removed from office; or
2. Disqualified from holding office under the Constitution of Kentucky
or the Kentucky Revised Statutes.
(2) The Secretary of State shall issue a jailer service card to a qualified jailer who
applies to receive a card under this section. The jailer service card shall serve as
an acknowledgement by the Secretary of State that the jailer service cardholder
currently serves or previously served as a jailer in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky.
(3) The Secretary of State shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to establish:
(a) Protocols for verifying the identity of the applicant and that the applicant is
a qualified jailer;
(b) The form of applications for the issuance of a jailer service card;
(c) The design and printed content of the jailer service card which shall, at a
minimum:
1. Distinguish between currently serving jailers and jailers who have
previously served;
2. Identify the cardholder; and
3. Identify the county in which the cardholder holds or held the office of
Page 1 of 2
BR024500.100 - 245 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 245
jailer;
(d) The costs of the jailer service card to be paid by the applicant, which shall
not exceed the actual cost of producing the physical card; and
(e) Any other matters required to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
BR024500.100 - 245 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:53 AM Jacketed